Washington statutes.
RCW 19.390.040

Notice requirements.

(1) The written notice provided by the parties, as required by RCW 19.390.030, must include:

(a) The names of the parties and their current business addresses;

(b) Identification of all locations where health care services are currently provided by each party;

(c) A brief description of the nature and purpose of the proposed material change; and

(d) The anticipated effective date of the proposed material change.

(2) Nothing in this section prohibits the parties to a material change from voluntarily providing additional information to the attorney general.

[ 2019 c 267 s 4.]